Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.4051, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Light rail transit; certain operating and capital maintenance costs. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "Blue Line extension" means that portion of the Blue Line light rail transit line from Target Field Station in Minneapolis to Brooklyn Park, also known as the Blue Line light rail transit extension project. new text end new text begin (b) After operating revenue and federal funds are used for operations or ongoing capital maintenance costs attributable to the Blue Line extension, the council must pay all remaining costs from county sources. new text end new text begin (c) Hennepin County must provide for the county sources under paragraph (b) from one or more of: sales tax revenue, as defined in section 473.4465, subdivision 1; or the county transportation sales tax under section 297A.993. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end